California statutes. Education Code
(4) Demonstrated management and supportive services necessary to efficiently and effectively meet the intent of this article.

(5) District matching funds or in-kind matching resources in support of teachers participating in training programs under this article.

(d) Agencies maintaining programs for the training of bilingual teachers on waiver shall have their programs approved for a period not to exceed three consecutive years, contingent upon all of the following:

(1) The availability of funds.

(2) The submission of acceptable plans and modifications thereof.

(3) An annual evaluation that demonstrates that participants have made significant progress toward passing competency requirements leading to bilingual teachers certification. Upon the successful completion of a three-year cycle, centers shall be eligible to reapply for continued funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

52183.

The department shall establish minimum requirements for teachers who may wish to participate in the program, including, but not limited to, the following requirements:

(a) That the teacher is working in a bilingual classroom serving pupils of limited-English-proficiency and is under a bilingual teacher waiver issued pursuant to Section 52178.

(b) That the teacher’s waiver application includes a certification by an assessor agency approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing issued pursuant to Section 52178.

(c) That the teacher is enrolled and participating in a program leading to a bilingual specialist
 credential or a certificate of competence for bilingual-crosscultural instruction pursuant to Section 44253.5.

(d) That the teacher demonstrates the ability and commitment to meet the requirements of the certificate of competence within the time period specified in Section 52178.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 25.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

52185.

Agencies funded under Section 52182 to provide training services shall report annually to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the information required under Section 52184.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1461, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

52186.

The department shall provide ongoing technical assistance and support for districts establishing or continuing bilingual teacher training assistance programs under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1169, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bilingual Teacher Professional Development Program [52200. - 52202.]

52200.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Bilingual Teacher Professional Development Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 54.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52201.

(a) (1) The purpose of the grant program established under this article is to ensure that California can meet the demand for bilingual teachers necessary for the implementation of dual language and other bilingual education programs as authorized by the California Education for a Global Economy Initiative, approved by the voters as Proposition 58 at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election, and to ensure California is able to meet the demand in preparing bilingual education teachers.

(2) The purpose of this grant program shall also be to increase bilingual teachers in multiple languages to staff bilingual classrooms, such as Spanish, Vietnamese, Mandarin, Cantonese, Tagalog, and Arabic classrooms, and other languages, as represented in
 instructional programs.

(b) The Legislature hereby establishes the Bilingual Teacher Professional Development Program for teachers seeking to provide instruction in bilingual and multilingual settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 81.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52202.

(a) The Bilingual Teacher Professional Development Program shall be administered by the department in consultation with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The department shall issue grants to applicants through a competitive process.

(b) (1) The department shall allocate grant funding to eligible local educational agencies, including county offices of education, school districts, charter schools, or a consortia of local educational agencies for purposes of providing professional development services to teachers or paraprofessionals who satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c). Grant recipients may partner with community colleges, public or private four-year institutions of postsecondary education, and professional organizations or
 nonprofit organizations with English learner expertise.

(2) The department shall issue a minimum of five grants under the program.

(c) (1) A teacher shall be eligible for professional development services pursuant to subdivision (b) if the teacher possesses a teaching credential or an education specialist credential authorizing the holder to teach pupils with exceptional needs, and does either of the following:

(A) Possesses an authorization to provide instruction to English learners pursuant to Section 44253.3, 44253.4, or 44253.7, and has provided instruction solely in English-only classrooms for three years or more.

(B) Is fluent in a language other than English, and seeks an authorization pursuant to Section 44253.3, 44253.4,
 or 44253.7 to provide instruction to English learners.

(2) A school paraprofessional employee shall be eligible for professional development services if the employee is fluent in a language other than English, seeks to work with English learners or in a bilingual program, and intends to enter a pathway to become a credentialed teacher who holds a bilingual authorization.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), participants who are currently enrolled in, or have completed, the Asian Language Bilingual Teacher Education Program shall be eligible for professional development services.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), participants who are currently enrolled in, or have completed, programs to support bilingual teacher education in languages in
 the classroom, such as Arabic, Cantonese, Mandarin, Spanish, Tagalog, and Vietnamese, and other languages, as represented in an instructional program, shall be eligible for professional development services.

(d) In selecting a grant recipient pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall ensure that an applicant indicates how it plans to increase the number of teachers who obtain a bilingual authorization as a result of participation in the program and increase the number of teachers with a bilingual authorization who return to teaching in a bilingual or multilingual setting.

(e) In awarding funding to eligible applicants pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall adopt criteria demonstrating an applicant’s ability to provide professional development services. The adopted criteria shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Demonstrated commitment to bilingual and multilingual education and bilingual teacher development.

(2) Demonstrated capability to fully prepare teachers to obtain bilingual authorizations and to improve or update a teacher’s knowledge and skills relating to biliteracy, English language acquisition, English language development, pupil assessment in English and other languages, and instruction in the components of a high-quality bilingual or multilingual education program.

(3) The availability of bilingual education staff with demonstrated experience and knowledge of bilingual and multilingual education for purposes of providing professional development programs.

(4) Demonstrated management and support services necessary to efficiently and effectively
 use funding provided under subdivision (b) to help meet the demand for bilingual teachers.

(5) Matching funds, or other in-kind matching resources, offered by the applicant in support of a professional development program funded pursuant to this article.

(6) Capacity to conduct an evaluation of a professional development program offered by the applicant for the purpose of identifying areas of strength, areas requiring improvement, and recommendations for making improvement.

(f) The department shall ensure grant recipients selected for purposes of this article, to the maximum extent possible, are balanced with regard to geographic regions and urban and rural settings.

(g) The department shall meet quarterly with grant recipients to share promising
 practices and resources, and to resolve issues of implementation.

(h) (1) By January 1, 2022, grant recipients awarded funds appropriated pursuant to Section 85 of Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 2017 shall provide a final report to the department on the number of participants who were issued bilingual authorizations, the number of previously authorized teachers who have participated in the program and subsequently returned to bilingual teaching assignments, and the number of teachers who are still working at least 50 percent of the time in a bilingual setting.

(2) The project performance period for Bilingual Teacher Professional Development grant funds appropriated pursuant to Section 85 of Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 2017 is January 1, 2018, to June 30, 2021, inclusive.

(i) (1) By July 1, 2026, grant recipients awarded funds appropriated pursuant to Section 119 of Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023 shall provide a preliminary report, and, by January 1, 2030, a final report, to the department on the number of participants who were issued bilingual authorizations, the number of previously authorized teachers who have participated in the program and subsequently returned to bilingual teaching assignments, and the number of teachers who are still working at least 50 percent of the time in a bilingual setting.

(2) The project performance period for Bilingual Teacher Professional Development grant funds appropriated pursuant to Section 119 of Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023 is January 1, 2024, to June 30, 2029, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 830, Sec. 1.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.3. Advanced Placement Program [52240. - 52243.]

52240.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Advanced placement courses, for which school credit is awarded, provide rigorous academic coursework opportunities for high school pupils and help to improve the overall curriculum at schools where those courses are provided.

(2) The successful completion of advanced placement courses and the subsequent advanced placement examinations, which are conducted by the College Entrance Examination Board and for which college credit is awarded, provide a cost-effective means for high school pupils to obtain college-level coursework experience.

(3) To the extent economically
 disadvantaged pupils are provided financial assistance to take advanced placement examinations, they will be provided with successful college-level experience and be encouraged to pursue postsecondary education opportunities.

(b) The Superintendent shall annually update the information on advanced placement available on the department’s Internet Web site to include current information on the various means available to school districts to offer or access advanced placement courses, including online courses. The Superintendent shall annually communicate with high schools that offer advanced placement courses in fewer than five subjects, and inform them of the various options for making advanced placement courses and other rigorous courses available to pupils who may benefit from them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 27.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

52242.

A school district may help pay for all or part of the costs of one or more advanced placement examinations that are charged to economically disadvantaged pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 29.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

52243.

On or before February 1, 2025, the department shall request the College Board to provide an alternative testing date at the end of the fall semester for pupils whose advanced placement courses conclude in the fall semester, while maintaining the option for those pupils to take the advanced placement examination for those courses during the spring semester, at the discretion of the pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 885, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Career Technical Education [52300. - 52462.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regional Occupational Centers [52300. - 52334.7.]

52300.

In enacting this article, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide qualified students with the opportunity to attend a technical school or enroll in a career technical or technical training program, regardless of the geographical location of their residence in a county or region. The Legislature hereby declares that a regional occupational center will serve the state and national interests in providing career technical and technical education to prepare students for an increasingly technological society in which generalized training and skills are
 insufficient to prepare high school students and graduates, and out-of-school youth and adults for the many employment opportunities which require special or technical training and skills. The Legislature also declares that regional occupational centers will enable a broader curriculum in technical subjects to be offered, and will avoid unnecessary duplication of courses and expensive training equipment, and will provide a flexibility in operation which will facilitate rapid program adjustments and meeting changing training needs as they arise.

It is recognized by the Legislature that career technical programs may achieve great flexibility of planning, scope and operation by the conduct of these programs in a variety of physical facilities at various training locations.

It is the further intent of the Legislature that regional occupational centers and programs provide career technical and occupational instruction related to
 the attainment of skills so that trainees are prepared for gainful employment in the area for which training was provided, or are upgraded so they have the higher level skills required because of new and changing technologies or so that they are prepared for enrollment in more advanced training programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52301.

(a) (1) The county superintendent of schools of each county, with the consent of the state board, may establish and maintain, or with one or more counties may establish and maintain, a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, in the county to provide education and training in career technical courses. The governing boards of any school districts maintaining high schools in the county may, with the consent of the state board and of the county superintendent of schools, cooperate in the establishment
 and maintenance of a regional occupational center or program, except that if a school district also maintains 500 or more schools, its governing board may establish and maintain one or more regional occupational centers or programs, without those restrictions. A regional occupational center or program may be established by two or more school districts maintaining high schools through the use of the staff and facilities of a community college or community colleges serving the same geographic area as the school districts maintaining the high schools, with the consent of the state board and the county superintendent of schools.

 (2) The establishment and maintenance of a regional occupational center or program, by two or more school districts may be undertaken pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. In a regional occupational center or program, the functions of the county
 auditor undertaken pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall be performed by the county superintendent of schools in a county in which the board of supervisors has transferred educational functions from the county auditor to the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 42649, as added by Chapter 533 of the Statutes of 1977, and 85265.5. If a school district or school districts establish and maintain a regional occupational center or program, pursuant to this chapter, the county superintendent of schools may, with the consent of the state board, establish and maintain a separate regional occupational center or centers or program or programs.

(b) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a single school district located in a class 1 county, as defined in Section 1205, and having an average daily attendance of 50,000 or more, or a single school
 district located in a class 2 county, as defined in Section 1205, and having an average daily attendance of 100,000 or more, may apply to the state board through the county superintendent of schools for permission to establish a regional occupational center or program. Except as provided in subdivision (c), the state board shall, within 90 days of receipt of an application, prescribe a procedure whereby the school district may establish a center or program in accordance with its application and in compliance with the provisions of the State Plan for Career Technical Education. The county superintendent of schools may supervise establishment of the center or program.

(c) (1) The state board may disapprove a waiver application submitted by a single school district pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 33050) of Chapter 1 of Part 20 for permission to establish a regional occupational center or program which does not
 meet the requirements of this section if the state board determines that the establishment of the center or program would have an adverse effect upon existing regional occupational centers or programs located in school districts which are contiguous to the applicant school district.

(2) The state board shall establish criteria to measure adverse effect. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, hardship on (A) school districts operating regional occupational centers or programs which are contiguous to the applicant school district and (B) students of school districts operating regional occupational centers or programs that are contiguous to the applicant school district.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any regional occupational center or program operated by a single school district under Section 33050 shall be granted permanent status if the single school
 district has previously been granted two waivers from the state board to operate a single school district regional occupational center or program and the single school district maintains at least three but not more than five comprehensive high schools within the school district. The revenue limit for a regional occupational center or program established under this subdivision shall be the lower of either: (1) the revenue limit under which the center or program operates as of January 1, 1985, or (2) the revenue limit of the school district as of January 1, 1985, except that this revenue limit shall be subject to annual percentage cost-of-living adjustments provided for regional occupational centers and programs. The governing board of the school district shall retain authority to decide whether or not to operate the regional occupational center or program under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52301.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 52301, the State Board of Education may grant permanent status to the Kern Union High School District to operate a single district regional occupational center or program, if that status is requested in writing by the county superintendent of schools of Kern County and the governing board of the Kern Union High School District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 762, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

52301.5.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “California Occupational Information System” means the statewide comprehensive labor market and occupational supply and demand information system described by Section 10530 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) “State-Local Cooperative Labor Market Information program” means that labor market information system established in Section 10533 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) “Job market study” means a review of the existing educational programs in light of available labor market information, including occupational supply and demand, for a labor market area.

(d) “Labor market area” means a county or aggregation of counties designated by the Employment Development Department that has one or more central core cities and that meets criteria of population, population density, commute patterns, and social and economic integration specified by the Employment Development Department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.

(a) On or before July 1, 2010, the governing board of each regional occupational center or program shall ensure that at least 90 percent of all state-funded courses offered by the center or program, in occupational areas in which both the program or center and the community college offer instruction, are part of occupational course sequences that target comprehensive skills. Each occupational sequence shall do all of the following:

(1) Result in an occupational skill certificate
 developed in cooperation with the appropriate employer advisory board created under Section 52302.2.

(2) Provide prerequisite courses that are needed to enter apprenticeship or postsecondary vocational certificate or degree programs. Where possible, sequenced courses shall be linked to certificate and degree programs in the region.

(3) Focus on occupations requiring comprehensive skills leading to high entry-level wages or the possibility of significant wage increases after a few years on the job, or both.

(4) Offer as many courses as possible that have been approved by the University of California as courses meeting the “A-G” admissions requirements.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2008, the governing board of each regional
 occupational center or program shall develop a plan for establishing sequences of courses, and certify to the department, that those sequences have been developed, as described in subdivision (a). The board shall consult with the superintendents of the school districts served by the center or program and presidents of community colleges in the area during the development of the plan.

(2) The plan shall be presented at a public hearing by the governing board of each school district served by the regional occupational center or program and by the county board of education.

(3) Community college boards with identified articulated programs shall also review the plans in a public session.

(4) In developing the plan, each regional occupational program or center shall consult with school districts and community college
 districts located within the region served by the program or center and with the relevant occupational advisers and local workforce investment board to ensure the plan meets the vocational education needs of high school pupils in the region by providing sequences of courses that begin with middle or high school introductory courses, including, but not limited to, occupational skill courses provided by high schools or regional occupational programs or centers.

(5) The plan shall maximize the use of local, state, and federal resources in helping high school pupils enter comprehensive skill occupations or apprenticeship programs, or continue education in college, or all of these, after graduating from high school.

(6) The plan shall include strategies for filling gaps in courses or other services needed to make the sequences effective in meeting the needs of pupils in developing
 skills and attending community college upon graduation from high school.

(7) Each center or program shall submit a copy of the approved plan to the appropriate community college or colleges in the region and the Superintendent on or before September 1, 2008. Every four years after this date, on or before July 1, each center and program shall submit an update to the plan to the local community college or colleges and the Superintendent.

(c) As a condition of receiving federal funds provided under the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act of 1998 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.), or a successor of that act, and to the extent permitted by federal law, school districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community college districts shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop course
 sequences that meet the requirements of this section according to the schedule set forth in this paragraph.

(A) On or before July 1, 2008, school districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community college districts shall have adopted an approved plan as required under this section.

(B) On or before July 1, 2009, school districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community college districts shall have established course sequences as required under this section that include at least one-third of the courses offered by the regional occupational center or program in occupational areas in which both the program or center and the community college offer instruction.

(C) On or before July 1, 2010, school districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community college districts
 shall have established course sequences as required under this section that include at least two-thirds of the courses offered by the regional occupational center or program in occupational areas in which both the program or center and the community college offer instruction.

(2) Provide pupils who are participating in vocational sequences with information and experiences designed to increase their postgraduation work and school options, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Information about the admissions requirements of the University of California and California State University.

(B) Information about the placement requirements of the local community college or colleges.

(C) Information about higher education options related to
 the interests of the pupil.

(D) Encourage visits to local colleges and universities offering programs that allow pupils to gain additional skills and degrees in related occupations.

(E) Information and referrals to employers for internships, summer employment opportunities, and employment after graduation from high school.

(3) School districts, regional occupational centers or programs, and community college districts that do not develop course sequences on or before the dates established under this subdivision, and have not received a waiver under subdivision (d), shall enter into a corrective action plan with the department and shall meet any timelines established by the Superintendent.

(d) (1) The department, with the assistance
 of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall meet with each program or center and the community college or colleges in the region no later than the 2009–10 fiscal year to validate that course sequences meeting the requirements of this section have been developed. These meetings shall be conducted using the existing resources of the department and shall be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to Section 51226.

(2) The department and the office of the chancellor shall provide technical assistance to programs or centers and community colleges that have developed articulated sequences for less than half of the courses offered by the program or center.

(3) The Superintendent may waive the requirements of subdivision (a) for programs or centers and community colleges located in rural areas of the state if the Superintendent finds that
 development of sequences is infeasible because of the distance, travel time, or safety between the center or program and the community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 223, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.2.

(a) The governing board of each regional occupational center or program shall establish and maintain an employer advisory board or boards pursuant to guidelines developed by the department. The advisory board shall do all of the following:

(1) Assist in the development of skill certificates that identify the skills and knowledge that pupils
 completing an occupational course sequence are expected to acquire upon completing the sequence. The advisory board also shall recommend the measures and criteria, and methods to evaluate whether pupils actually acquired the identified skills and knowledge.

(2) Review at least once a year whether pupils who are assessed as having met the requirements for a skill certificate possess the skills needed for success in employment in that occupation.

(3) Review the specific occupational sequences offered by the regional occupational center or program to train pupils for jobs that are in demand and offer high beginning salaries or the potential for significant wage increase after several years on the job.

(4) Assist the regional occupational center or program in developing internships, paid summer employment, and
 postgraduation employment opportunities for pupils participating in the course sequences.

(5) Assist the regional occupational center or program in identifying and creating college scholarships for pupils participating in the course sequences.

(b) Employer advisory boards shall be composed of representatives of trade organizations and businesses or government agencies that hire a significant number of employees each year and require the skills and knowledge that are taught in the course sequence or sequences in that occupational area, as well as at least one representative from a school district career technical educational advisory committee. The department shall develop regulations guiding the establishment of these boards.

(c) Regional occupational centers or programs operated in a rural county of the sixth,
 seventh, or eighth class may designate a local business or industry organization as the advisory board and consult with the leadership of the local business or industry organization to determine skill needs in the region and emerging job market needs. For purposes of this section, the local business organization may be designated as the advisory board for the regional occupational center or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 58, Sec. 1.   (SB 640)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.3.

(a) Every career technical course or program offered by a school district or districts or county superintendent or superintendents sponsoring a regional occupational center or program shall be reviewed every two years by the appropriate governing body to assure that each course or program does all of the following:

(1) Meets a documented labor market demand.

(2) Does not represent unnecessary duplication of other
 job skills training programs in the area.

(3) Is of demonstrated effectiveness as measured by the employment and completion success of its pupils.

(b) Any course or program that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) and the standards promulgated by the governing body shall be terminated within one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.5.

A regional occupational center or regional occupational program shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide individual counseling and guidance in career technical matters.

(b) Provide a curriculum that includes a sequence of academic and skill instruction in specific occupational fields leading to an approved skill certificate and vocational degree, apprenticeship, or postsecondary certificate program pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 52302, or provide an opportunity for pupils to acquire entry-level career technical skills.

(c) Maintain a pupil-teacher ratio which will enable pupils to achieve optimum benefits from the instructional program.

(d) Assign the highest priority in services to youth from the age of 16 to 18 years, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.8.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that vocational training resources that are provided through regional occupational centers and programs are an essential component of the state’s secondary school system and the local system of providing occupational skills training to high school pupils. For this reason, the Legislature finds and declares that these resources should be focused primarily on the needs of pupils enrolled in high school.

(b) For the 2008–09 fiscal year, a regional occupational center or program may claim no more than 50 percent of the state-funded average daily attendance for which the center or program is eligible, for services provided to students who
 are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(c) For the 2009–10 fiscal year, a regional occupational center or program may claim no more than 30 percent of the state-funded average daily attendance for which the center or program is eligible, for services provided to students who are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(d) For the 2011–12 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, a regional occupational center or program may claim no more than 10 percent of the state-funded average daily attendance for which the center or program is eligible, for services provided to students who are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, and up to an additional 5 percent for CalWORKs, Temporary Assistance Program, or Job Corps participants and participants under the federal
 Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) who are enrolled in Intensive Training services.

(e) Pupils who are CalWORKs, Temporary Assistance Program, or Job Corps participants shall have priority for service within the percentage limits established under subdivision (d).

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), a regional occupational center or program may claim more than 15 percent of its average daily attendance for students who are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, if all of the students who are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, are CalWORKs, Temporary Assistance Program, or Job Corps participants, and if the governing board of the regional occupational center or program does all of the following:

(1) Meets with local human services directors, and representatives of adult education programs, community colleges, and other institutions of higher education, to assess the needs of CalWORKs, Temporary Assistance Program, or Job Corps and federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act participants to identify alternative ways to meet the needs of these adult students.

(2) Enters into a transition plan, approved by the Superintendent, to become in compliance with subdivision
 (d) in accordance with benchmarks and timelines established in the transition plan. Transition plans shall be established pursuant to guidelines issued by the department, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, and shall be resubmitted and reviewed annually.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), a regional occupational center or program that claims more than 40 percent of its students are not enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, on January 1, 2007, shall submit a letter to the Superintendent by July 1 of each year until it complies with this subdivision, outlining the goals of the regional occupational center or program to reduce the number of adult students in order to comply with subdivision (d) on or before July 1, 2013.

(h) Regional
 occupational centers and programs operated in a rural county of the sixth, seventh, or eighth class may exceed the number of adults by an additional 10 percent of the limits established in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d). 

(i) Adult average daily attendance funding for a regional occupational center or program that has entered into a corrective action plan pursuant to subdivision (k) shall not be redirected to other regional occupational centers or programs to serve additional secondary pupils for up to three years while the regional occupational center or program is in corrective action.

(j) The governing boards of a community college district and a regional occupational center or program may enter into contractual agreements under which the center or program provides services to
 adult students of the community college district affected by this section if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The agreements conform to state regulations and audit requirements jointly developed by the Chancellor of the Office of the California Community Colleges and the department, in consultation with, and subject to approval by, the Department of Finance.

(2) A course offered for adults pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to this subdivision is limited to the same cost per student to the state as if the course were offered at the regional occupational center or program. This subdivision does not authorize the apportionment of funds for community colleges for adult students in excess of the revenue limit for regional occupational centers or programs if a course
 is deemed eligible for college credit.

(k) A regional occupational center or program that fails to meet a timeline established under subdivision (c), (d), or (g) shall meet with the community college, adult education program, or other adult service to identify alternative means of meeting the needs of adult students and shall enter into a corrective action plan administered by the department. The corrective action plan shall be established pursuant to guidelines issued by the department and shall be submitted to the department annually for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 13.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.9.

Regional occupational centers and programs may jointly establish, operate, and share the enrollments and costs of career technical education instruction with adult education programs offered by school districts serving the same geographic area. These programs shall be approved by the State Board of Education and the county superintendent of schools and shall be subject to guidelines established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. These programs shall also be funded at the adult revenue limit amount provided pursuant to Section 42238.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52303.
